Oklahoma, session 2025, SB1045.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 59 O.S. 2021, Section 1354, as
amended by Section 1, Chapter 66, O.S.L. 2023 (59 O.S. Supp. 2024,
Section 1354), is amended to read as follows:
Section 1354. There is hereby re-created, to continue until
July 1, 2025, pursuant to the provisions of the Oklahoma Sunset Law,
the State Board of Examiners of Psychologists. The Board shall
administer the provisions of the Psychologists Licensing Act. The
Board shall consist of seven (7) members appointed by the Governor.
Five members shall be psychologists from various areas in psychology
and two members shall be lay persons. At the expiration of the term
of each Board member who is a psychologist, the Governor shall
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1045 SFLR Page 1
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

appo int a successor from a list of ten licensed psychologists which
is provided by the Oklahoma State Psychological Association. In
selecting appointees, the Governor may consider recommendations from
a statewide organization representing psychologists, a state chapter
of a national organization representing psychologists, or other
groups or individuals in this state. Members shall serve for a term
of four (4) years and until a successor is appointed and qualified.
Before entering upon the duties of office, each member of the Board
shall take the constitutional oath of office and file it with the
Secretary of State.
SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 59 O.S. 2021, Section 1357, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 1357. After giving the member a written statement of
the charges and an opportunity to be heard thereon, the Governor may
remove any member of the State Board of Examiners of Psychologists
for misconduct, incompetency, or neglect of duty. Any vacancy in
the membership of the Board shall be filled by the Governor for the
unexpired term. If there is a vacancy in the psychologist
membership of the Board, the Governor shall fill it from a list of
ten (10) psychologists which is provided by the Oklahoma State
Psychological Association. In selecting appointees, the Governor
may consider recommendations from a statewide organization
representing psychologists, a state chapter of a national

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1045 SFLR Page 2
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

orga nization representing psychologists, or other groups or
individuals in this state.
SECTION 3. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.
COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES
February 24, 2025 - DO PASS




















SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1045 SFLR Page 3
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)